Utah statutes.
73-22-4.   Ownership of geothermal resource -- Lands subject to chapter.

(1) Ownership of a geothermal resource derives from an interest in land and not from an appropriative right to geothermal fluids.

(2)  This chapter shall apply to all lands in the State of Utah, including federal and Indian lands to the extent allowed by law. When these lands are committed to a unit agreement involving lands subject to federal or Indian jurisdiction, the division may, with respect to the unit agreement, deem this chapter complied with if the unit operations are regulated by the United States and the division finds that conservation of geothermal resources and prevention of waste are accomplished under the unit agreement.



Enacted by Chapter 188, 1981 General Session

